Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5095.
people of the state of michigan enact: Enacting section 1. Sections 101, 103, 105, 201, 211, 213, 215, 217, 301, 303, 305, 307, 309, 311, 313, 401, 403, 405, 407, 409, 501, 503, 505, 507, 509, 511, 513, 515, 601, 602, 603, 605, 607, 609, and 801 of the industrial hemp growers act, 2020 PA 220, MCL 333.29101, 333.29103, 333.29105, 333.29201, 333.29211, 333.29213, 333.29215, 333.29217, 333.29301, 333.29303, 333.29305, 333.29307, 333.29309, 333.29311, 333.29313, 333.29401, 333.29403, 333.29405, 333.29407, 333.29409, 333.29501, 333.29503, 333.29505, 333.29507, 333.29509, 333.29511, 333.29513, 333.29515, 333.29601, 333.29602, 333.29603, 333.29605, 333.29607, 333.29609, and 333.29801, are repealed. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act takes effect February 1, 2026.